North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-11 Board of County Commissioners
11-11-42.
When appeal filed — When tried.

An appeal from a decision of a board of county commissioners shall be filed on or before the first day of the term of the district court following the taking of the appeal, and the cause shall stand for trial at such term.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 47; R.C. 1895, § 1929; R.C. 1899, § 1929; R.C. 1905, § 2425; C.L. 1913, § 3300; R.C. 1943, § 11-1142.

11-11-43.
Appeals docketed — Procedure.

All appeals taken from decisions of a board of county commissioners must be docketed as other causes pending in the district court. Section 28-34-01 governs all appeals taken under sections 11-11-39 through 11-11-43.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 49; R.C. 1895, § 1930; R.C. 1899, § 1930; R.C. 1905, § 2426; C.L. 1913, § 3301; R.C. 1943, § 11-1143; S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 5.

Note.

This section, prior to its amendment in 1989, provided for a de novo review standard. The cases annotated below should be read in light of this change.

11-11-44.
District court may enter final judgment on appeal — Enforcement.

The district court may enter a final judgment on an appeal from a decision of a board of county commissioners and cause the judgment to be executed, or it may send the judgment to the board with an order showing how to proceed. The court may require the board to comply with its order by mandamus or by attachment for contempt.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 50; R.C. 1895, § 1931; R.C. 1899, § 1931; R.C. 1905, § 2427; C.L. 1913, § 3302; R.C. 1943, § 11-1144.

11-11-45.
Judgments against counties — Power of board of county commissioners. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 14; S.L. 1881, ch. 54, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1889; R.C. 1899, § 1889; R.C. 1905, § 2378; C.L. 1913, § 3251; R.C. 1943, § 11-1145; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-46.
Payment of judgment obtained by state or an agency thereof against county — Duty of county commissioners and auditor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 133, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1146; S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 13; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-47.
Tax is paid into judgment payment fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 133, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1147; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-48.
Property in county not subject to seizure for judgment.

The property of a county and of persons owning property situated or liable to taxation therein shall not be subject to the lien of a judgment against the county nor to seizure or sale upon execution or other process of any court issued in connection with any such judgment.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 14; S.L. 1881, ch. 54, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1889; R.C. 1899, § 1889; R.C. 1905, § 2378; C.L. 1913, § 3251; S.L. 1941, ch. 133, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1148.

11-11-49.
Board may offer reward.

The board of county commissioners may offer a reward for the apprehension and conviction of each individual violating any of the provisions of chapters 12.1-21 and 12.1-23.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 61, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 7592a; R.C. 1905, § 9352; C.L. 1913, § 10087; R.C. 1943, § 11-1149; S.L. 1961, ch. 125, § 1; 1981, ch. 91, § 5; 2003, ch. 90, § 1.

11-11-50.
Former members of armed services’ room in courthouses.

The board of county commissioners shall equip and maintain an adequate room in the courthouse or county office building for the priority preference use of former members of the armed services of the United States if the county seat has a population of over ten thousand inhabitants and a memorial building has not been erected in such municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 116, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1150; 2015, ch. 91, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 91, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

11-11-51.
Petitions to board of county commissioners — Qualifications of signers.

The signers of any petition presented to the board of county commissioners praying for the expenditure of county funds shall be qualified electors of the district affected by the petition.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 271, § 1; 1921, ch. 50, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3295a; R.C. 1943, § 11-1151; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 18.

11-11-52.
Board may provide room for historical society.

The board of county commissioners of any county, or the governing body of any municipal corporation, or the board of any public library in the state is hereby authorized and empowered to furnish a room or rooms in the county courthouse, in a municipal building, or in a public library building, as the case may be, for the use of the historical society of such county, and to furnish light and heat therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 344, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-1152.

11-11-53.
Appropriation for historical works — Authorization of tax levy — Approval of state historical society and attorney general.

The board of county commissioners of any county may appropriate out of the general fund of the county a sum, not exceeding five thousand dollars annually, to be paid to the historical society of the county and used for the promotion of historical work within the borders of the county, including the collection, preservation, and publication of historical material, and to disseminate historical information of the county, and in general to defray the expense of carrying on historical work in the county.

The board of county commissioners may levy a tax, not exceeding the limitation in subsection 3 of section 57-15-06.7, for the promotion of historical works within the borders of the county and in general defray the expense of carrying on historical work in the county, including the maintenance of any historical room or building, and furthering the work of the historical society of the county. The levy is in addition to any moneys appropriated from the general fund of the county for historical work as provided in subsection 1. The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, submit the question of a voter-approved tax levy to the qualified electors of the county at the next countywide general, primary, or special election. If sixty percent of the qualified electors voting on the question approve, a tax may be levied not exceeding the limitation in subsection 3 of section 57-15-06.7, which tax may be expended as provided in this section. Voter-approved levy authority under this section authorized by electors of a county before January 1, 2015, remains in effect through taxable year 2024 or for the time period authorized by the electors, whichever expires first. After January 1, 2015, approval or reauthorization by electors of voter-approved levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than ten taxable years.

The appropriation and levy authorized by this section may not be used to defray any expenses of a county historical society until it is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation, is affiliated with and has its articles of incorporation and bylaws approved by the state historical society and the attorney general, and has contracted with the board of county commissioners in regard to the manner in which the funds received will be expended and the services to be provided. Historical societies that qualified for county funds under subsection 1 before July 1, 1965, are not required to have articles of incorporation and bylaws approved by the attorney general to receive funds under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 344, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-1153; S.L. 1965, ch. 101, § 1; 1969, ch. 131, § 1; 1975, ch. 95, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 14; 2001, ch. 503, § 2; 2015, ch. 88, § 9; 2015, ch. 439 § 13, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 88, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Note.

Section 11-11-53 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 13 of Chapter 439, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 2144, and Section 9 of Chapter 88 Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2056.

11-11-53.1.
Donation of historical artifacts.

Any historical object or artifact given, donated, or otherwise acquired by a county historical society, upon acceptance by the state historical society, may revert to the state historical society if such local society should cease to function, exist, or no longer operate, unless the donor of such object or artifact should attach other conditions to the gift or artifact. If the county historical society should terminate its operations or should find that it no longer needs a historical object or an artifact, such society may give or trade such object or artifact to any other county historical society.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 101, § 2; 2021, ch. 89, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

11-11-54.
Nonprofit fair corporations — Receipt of real or personal property for fair purposes.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state which has received a gift real or personal property to be used for fair purposes is hereby authorized to transfer such property, or if the property is sold by the board of county commissioners, then to transfer the proceeds therefrom, to any nonprofit corporation in such county organized for the purpose of conducting an annual county fair. The nonprofit fair corporation upon receipt of such real or personal property shall agree to sponsor and conduct in the county an annual county fair for such number of years as may be agreed upon by the corporation and board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 119, § 1.

11-11-55.
County may agree to make improvements on private roads — Costs of improvements to constitute lien on real estate.

The board of county commissioners shall have the power to enter into agreements with private landowners for the purpose of making improvements on private roads. The board shall charge the landowner for the improvements made pursuant to such agreement, and such charges shall constitute a lien upon the real estate of the landowner in the same manner as personal property taxes are made a lien upon real estate as provided in chapter 57-22.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 132, § 1.

11-11-55.1.
Petition or resolution for improvements — Levy of special assessments — Levy of infrastructure fee.

The board of county commissioners of any county, by resolution or upon receipt of a petition of sixty percent of the landowners in a defined area, outside of the limits of any incorporated city, may install the petitioned improvements as benefit the defined area, provide for the financing of the improvements, and levy special assessments for the payment of all or part of the improvements within the defined area.

The board of county commissioners, by resolution or upon petition of sixty percent of the qualified electors who voted in the last general election in a defined area, may levy and collect an infrastructure fee in lieu of general special assessments on all residential and commercial county utility bills for payment of infrastructure maintenance costs. If a home rule county levies an infrastructure fee, the home rule county also may levy and collect green field special assessments.

In providing for the improvements, the county shall have the authority granted to municipalities in chapters 40-22, 40-23, 40-23.1, 40-24, 40-25, 40-26, 40-27, and 40-28, and the county shall comply with the provisions of those chapters in making the improvements. Whenever action is required of city officials in those chapters, the comparable county officials shall take the action.

As used in this section:

“General special assessments” means special assessments levied for the purpose of maintaining existing roads and infrastructure and special assessments levied for the construction or repair of arterial roads and infrastructure that provide a benefit to the entire community.

“Green field special assessments” means special assessments levied for infrastructure costs associated with the development of agricultural or undeveloped property.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; 1987, ch. 147, § 1; 2001, ch. 118, § 1; 2021, ch. 303, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

11-11-56.
Comprehensive health planning by counties and county funding of areawide comprehensive health planning.

Any county may engage in comprehensive health planning and may appropriate funds to an areawide comprehensive health planning organization organized and approved under provisions of the state plan for comprehensive health planning, whether such organization be a public agency or private corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 126, § 1.

11-11-57.
Counties may cooperate in predatory animal and injurious rodent control.

Boards of county commissioners may perform, within their respective counties, predatory animal, destructive bird, and injurious rodent control as defined in section 4-01-17.1, and may enter into cooperative agreements with the agriculture commissioner and the United States department of agriculture for this purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 4; 1993, ch. 45, § 1.

11-11-57.1.
Funds available for predatory control.

In order to perform bird and animal control, boards of county commissioners are authorized to make necessary expenditures from county special funds available for this purpose or from the county general or contingent funds.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 5.

11-11-58.
Programs and activities for senior citizens — Expenditure of funds.

The board of county commissioners is authorized to establish or maintain programs and activities for senior citizens, including the expansion of existing senior citizen centers which will provide recreational and other leisure-time activities, informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens, and assist such persons in providing volunteer community or civic services. The board is authorized to expend funds received from state, federal, or private sources for the public purposes provided for in this section. No expenditure authorized by this section shall be made to defray any expenses or any organization or agency until such organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the board in regard to the manner in which such funds will be expended and the services to be provided. An organization or agency and its program which receives such funds shall be reviewed or approved annually by the board to determine its eligibility to receive funds under the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 96, § 1.

11-11-59.
Creation of booster station by election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 164, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 19; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-60.
Booster station tax levy authorized. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 164, § 2; 1983, ch. 606, § 15; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-61.
Booster station levy exemptions — Townships not served. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 164, § 3; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-62.
County restriction of adult establishments — Definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult bookstore” means a bookstore having as a preponderance of its publications, books, magazines, and other periodicals which are distinguished or characterized by their emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection.

“Adult establishment” means either an adult bookstore, an adult motion picture theater, an adult mini-motion picture theater, or a massage business, all as defined in this subsection.

“Adult mini-motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity for less than fifty persons used for presenting motion pictures, a preponderance of which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection, for observation by patrons of the theater.

“Adult motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity of fifty or more persons used for presenting motion pictures, a preponderance of which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection, for observation by patrons of the theater.

“Massage” means the manipulation of body muscle or tissue by rubbing, stroking, kneading, or tapping, by hand or mechanical device.

“Massage business” means any establishment or business wherein massage is practiced, including establishments commonly known as health clubs, physical culture studios, massage studios, or massage parlors.

“Sexually oriented devices” means without limitation any artificial or simulated specified anatomical area or any other device or paraphernalia that is designed in whole or in part for specified sexual activities.

“Specified anatomical areas” means:

Less than completely and opaquely covered human genitals and pubic regions, buttocks, or female breasts below a point immediately above the top of the areola.

Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and opaquely covered.

“Specified sexual activities” means:

Human genitals in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal;

Acts of human masturbation, sexual intercourse, or sodomy; or

Fondling or other erotic touchings of human genitals and pubic regions, buttocks, or female breasts.

The board of county commissioners of any county may, upon proper resolution, provide that:

No building, premises, structure, or other facility that contains any adult establishment, as defined in subsection 1, shall contain any other kind of adult establishment.

No building, premises, structure, or other facility in which sexually oriented devices, as defined in subsection 1, are sold, distributed, exhibited, or contained shall contain any adult establishment, as defined in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 143, §§ 1, 2.

Collateral References.

Modern concept of obscenity, 5 A.L.R.3d 1158.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinances forbidding treatment in health clubs or massage salons by persons of the opposite sex, 51 A.L.R.3d 936.

What constitutes “public place” within meaning of statutes prohibiting commission of sexual act in public place, 96 A.L.R.3d 692.

Validity of ordinances restricting location of “adult entertainment” or sex-oriented businesses, 10 A.L.R.5th 538.

11-11-63.
Spouse abuse programs — Expenditure of funds.

The board of county commissioners may establish or maintain spouse abuse programs. For the purposes of this section, a spouse abuse program is a program that provides emergency housing for victims of domestic violence and their dependents, plus some or all of these additional services: counseling, advocacy, community education on domestic violence, support groups, twenty-four-hour crisis lines, or referral to other sources for services not provided by the spouse abuse program. The board of county commissioners may expend funds received from governmental or nongovernmental sources for the purpose of providing spouse abuse programs and providing grants to private organizations or agencies who provide such programs. No expenditure authorized by this section may be made to defray any expense of an organization or agency until the organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the board in regard to the manner in which such funds will be expended and the services will be provided. An organization or agency and its program which receives these funds must be reviewed for approval annually by the board of county commissioners to determine its continued eligibility to receive funds under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 160, § 1.

11-11-64.
Bond guarantee fund — Purpose — Limitations.

The board of county commissioners of any county having a population of not more than two thousand may establish a bond guarantee fund as provided in this section. The bond guarantee fund may be used to guarantee the indebtedness of nonprofit corporations organized for the purpose of constructing and operating nursing homes and related health care facilities located in this state. The nursing home or related health care facilities need not be located within the boundaries of the county establishing the bond guarantee fund. The board of county commissioners shall establish the terms and conditions of any agreements entered under this section. The funds used to guarantee a project under this section must be deposited in a federally insured account in such amounts as are determined necessary to guarantee the indebtedness of the nonprofit corporation incurred for the purposes authorized under this section. Nothing in this section is to be construed as creating an indebtedness of the county or the state or as incurring any liability on the county or the state, except the liability payable solely from the assets of the bond guarantee fund.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 148, § 1.

11-11-65.
Programs and activities for handicapped persons — Expenditure of funds.

The board of county commissioners may establish or maintain programs and activities for handicapped persons, including recreational and other leisure-time activities and informational, health, welfare, transportation, counseling, and referral services. The board may expend funds received from state, federal, or private sources or provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the public purposes provided for in this section. No expenditure may be made to defray any expenses of any organization or agency until the organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the board in regard to the manner in which the funds will be expended and the services will be provided. An organization or agency that receives the funds must be reviewed or approved annually by the board to determine its eligibility to receive funds under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 149, § 1; 2015, ch. 439 § 14, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-66.
Board may establish centennial coordinating committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

11-11-67.
Programs and activities of nonprofit organizations that assist the arts — Expenditure of funds.

The board of county commissioners may establish or maintain programs and activities for the benefit of nonprofit organizations that assist the arts, including the expansion of existing programs. A board of county commissioners may expend funds received from county, state, federal, or private sources for the public purposes provided for in this section. A board of county commissioners may not make an expenditure under this section to defray expenses or to assist an organization unless that organization is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the board of county commissioners with respect to the manner in which the funds will be expended and services provided. The board of county commissioners shall review annually an organization that receives funds under this section to determine the organization’s eligibility to receive public funds. As used in this section, “nonprofit organizations that assist the arts” means organizations recognized by the council on the arts.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 91, § 1.

11-11-68.
Limitation on authority — Seed.

Notwithstanding any other law, a county may not impose any requirements or restrictions pertaining to the registration, labeling, distribution, sale, handling, use, application, transportation, or disposal of seed.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 6.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.